Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-537
Policy; provisions excluded.

Such motor vehicle liability policy shall not insure any liability under any workers' compensation law nor any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of an employee of the insured while engaged in the employment, other than domestic, of the insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance, or repair of any such motor vehicle nor any liability for damage to property owned by, rented to, in charge of, or transported by the insured.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 37, p. 496;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 140.